Illinois, session 104th, HB3052.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The School Code is amended by changing Section 510-17a as follows: 6    (105 ILCS 5/10-17a)7    Sec. 10-17a. State, school district, and school report 8cards; Expanded High School Snapshot Report. 9    (1) By October 31, 2013 and October 31 of each subsequent 10school year, the State Board of Education, through the State 11Superintendent of Education, shall prepare a State report 12card, school district report cards, and school report cards, 13and shall by the most economical means provide to each school 14district in this State, including special charter districts 15and districts subject to the provisions of Article 34, the 16report cards for the school district and each of its schools. 17Because of the impacts of the COVID-19 public health emergency 18during school year 2020-2021, the State Board of Education 19shall have until December 31, 2021 to prepare and provide the 20report cards that would otherwise be due by October 31, 2021. 21During a school year in which the Governor has declared a 22disaster due to a public health emergency pursuant to Section 237 of the Illinois Emergency Management Agency Act, the report   HB3052- 2 -LRB104 09503 LNS 19565 b1cards for the school districts and each of its schools shall be 2prepared by December 31.3    (2) In addition to any information required by federal 4law, the State Superintendent shall determine the indicators 5and presentation of the school report card, which must 6include, at a minimum, the most current data collected and 7maintained by the State Board of Education related to the 8following:9        (A) school characteristics and student demographics, 10    including average class size, average teaching experience, 11    student racial/ethnic breakdown, and the percentage of 12    students classified as low-income; the percentage of 13    students classified as English learners, the number of 14    students who graduate from a bilingual or English learner 15    program, and the number of students who graduate from, 16    transfer from, or otherwise leave bilingual programs; the 17    percentage of students who have individualized education 18    plans or 504 plans that provide for special education 19    services; the number and the percentage of all students in 20    grades kindergarten through 8, disaggregated by the 21    student demographics described in this paragraph (A), in 22    each of the following categories: (i) those who have been 23    assessed for placement in a gifted education program or 24    accelerated placement, (ii) those who have enrolled in a 25    gifted education program or in accelerated placement, and 26    (iii) for each of categories (i) and (ii), those who   HB3052- 3 -LRB104 09503 LNS 19565 b1    received direct instruction from a teacher who holds a 2    gifted education endorsement; the number and the 3    percentage of all students in grades 9 through 12, 4    disaggregated by the student demographics described in 5    this paragraph (A), who have been enrolled in an advanced 6    academic program; the percentage of students scoring at 7    the "exceeds expectations" level on the assessments 8    required under Section 2-3.64a-5 of this Code; the 9    percentage of students who annually transferred in or out 10    of the school district; average daily attendance; the 11    per-pupil operating expenditure of the school district; 12    and the per-pupil State average operating expenditure for 13    the district type (elementary, high school, or unit);14        (B) curriculum information, including, where 15    applicable, Advanced Placement, International 16    Baccalaureate or equivalent courses, dual credit courses, 17    foreign language classes, computer science courses, school 18    personnel resources (including Career Technical Education 19    teachers), before and after school programs, 20    extracurricular activities, subjects in which elective 21    classes are offered, health and wellness initiatives 22    (including the average number of days of Physical 23    Education per week per student), approved programs of 24    study, awards received, community partnerships, and 25    special programs such as programming for the gifted and 26    talented, students with disabilities, and work-study   HB3052- 4 -LRB104 09503 LNS 19565 b1    students;2        (C) student outcomes, including, where applicable, the 3    percentage of students deemed proficient on assessments of 4    State standards, the percentage of students in the eighth 5    grade who pass Algebra, the percentage of students who 6    participated in workplace learning experiences, the 7    percentage of students enrolled in post-secondary 8    institutions (including colleges, universities, community 9    colleges, trade/vocational schools, and training programs 10    leading to career certification within 2 semesters of high 11    school graduation), the percentage of students graduating 12    from high school who are college and career ready, the 13    percentage of graduates enrolled in community colleges, 14    colleges, and universities who are in one or more courses 15    that the community college, college, or university 16    identifies as a developmental course, and the percentage 17    of students with disabilities under the federal 18    Individuals with Disabilities Education Act and Article 14 19    of this Code who have fulfilled the minimum State 20    graduation requirements set forth in Section 27-22 of this 21    Code and have been issued a regular high school diploma; 22        (D) student progress, including, where applicable, the 23    percentage of students in the ninth grade who have earned 24    5 credits or more without failing more than one core 25    class, a measure of students entering kindergarten ready 26    to learn, a measure of growth, and the percentage of   HB3052- 5 -LRB104 09503 LNS 19565 b1    students who enter high school on track for college and 2    career readiness;3        (E) the school environment, including, where 4    applicable, high school dropout rate by grade level, the 5    percentage of students with less than 10 absences in a 6    school year (not including the up to 5 absences for the 7    mental or behavior health of the student as provided by 8    Section 26-1 of this Code), the percentage of teachers 9    with less than 10 absences in a school year for reasons 10    other than professional development, leaves taken pursuant 11    to the federal Family Medical Leave Act of 1993, long-term 12    disability, or parental leaves, the 3-year average of the 13    percentage of teachers returning to the school from the 14    previous year, the number of different principals at the 15    school in the last 6 years, the number of teachers who hold 16    a gifted education endorsement, the process and criteria 17    used by the district to determine whether a student is 18    eligible for participation in a gifted education program 19    or advanced academic program and the manner in which 20    parents and guardians are made aware of the process and 21    criteria, the number of teachers who are National Board 22    Certified Teachers, disaggregated by race and ethnicity, 2 23    or more indicators from any school climate survey selected 24    or approved by the State and administered pursuant to 25    Section 2-3.153 of this Code, with the same or similar 26    indicators included on school report cards for all surveys   HB3052- 6 -LRB104 09503 LNS 19565 b1    selected or approved by the State pursuant to Section 2    2-3.153 of this Code, the combined percentage of teachers 3    rated as proficient or excellent in their most recent 4    evaluation, and, beginning with the 2022-2023 school year, 5    data on the number of incidents of violence that occurred 6    on school grounds or during school-related activities and 7    that resulted in an out-of-school suspension, expulsion, 8    or removal to an alternative setting, as reported pursuant 9    to Section 2-3.162;10        (F) a school district's and its individual schools' 11    balanced accountability measure, in accordance with 12    Section 2-3.25a of this Code;13        (G) the total and per pupil normal cost amount the 14    State contributed to the Teachers' Retirement System of 15    the State of Illinois in the prior fiscal year for the 16    school's employees, which shall be reported to the State 17    Board of Education by the Teachers' Retirement System of 18    the State of Illinois;19        (H) for a school district organized under Article 34 20    of this Code only, State contributions to the Public 21    School Teachers' Pension and Retirement Fund of Chicago 22    and State contributions for health care for employees of 23    that school district; 24        (I) a school district's Final Percent of Adequacy, as 25    defined in paragraph (4) of subsection (f) of Section 26    18-8.15 of this Code;  HB3052- 7 -LRB104 09503 LNS 19565 b1        (J) a school district's Local Capacity Target, as 2    defined in paragraph (2) of subsection (c) of Section 3    18-8.15 of this Code, displayed as a percentage amount;4        (K) a school district's Real Receipts, as defined in 5    paragraph (1) of subsection (d) of Section 18-8.15 of this 6    Code, divided by a school district's Adequacy Target, as 7    defined in paragraph (1) of subsection (b) of Section 8    18-8.15 of this Code, displayed as a percentage amount; 9        (L) a school district's administrative costs;10        (M) whether or not the school has participated in the 11    Illinois Youth Survey. In this paragraph (M), "Illinois 12    Youth Survey" means a self-report survey, administered in 13    school settings every 2 years, designed to gather 14    information about health and social indicators, including 15    substance abuse patterns and the attitudes of students in 16    grades 8, 10, and 12; 17        (N) whether the school offered its students career and 18    technical education opportunities; and 19        (O) beginning with the October 2024 report card, the 20    total number of school counselors, school social workers, 21    school nurses, and school psychologists by school, 22    district, and State, the average number of students per 23    school counselor in the school, district, and State, the 24    average number of students per school social worker in the 25    school, district, and State, the average number of 26    students per school nurse in the school, district, and   HB3052- 8 -LRB104 09503 LNS 19565 b1    State, and the average number of students per school 2    psychologist in the school, district, and State. 3    The school report card shall also provide information that 4allows for comparing the current outcome, progress, and 5environment data to the State average, to the school data from 6the past 5 years, and to the outcomes, progress, and 7environment of similar schools based on the type of school and 8enrollment of low-income students, special education students, 9and English learners.10    As used in this subsection (2): 11    "Accelerated placement" has the meaning ascribed to that 12term in Section 14A-17 of this Code. 13    "Administrative costs" means costs associated with 14executive, administrative, or managerial functions within the 15school district that involve planning, organizing, managing, 16or directing the school district. 17    "Advanced academic program" means a course of study, 18including, but not limited to, accelerated placement, advanced 19placement coursework, International Baccalaureate coursework, 20dual credit, or any course designated as enriched or honors, 21that a student is enrolled in based on advanced cognitive 22ability or advanced academic achievement compared to local age 23peers and in which the curriculum is substantially 24differentiated from the general curriculum to provide 25appropriate challenge and pace. 26    "Computer science" means the study of computers and   HB3052- 9 -LRB104 09503 LNS 19565 b1algorithms, including their principles, their hardware and 2software designs, their implementation, and their impact on 3society. "Computer science" does not include the study of 4everyday uses of computers and computer applications, such as 5keyboarding or accessing the Internet. 6    "Gifted education" means educational services, including 7differentiated curricula and instructional methods, designed 8to meet the needs of gifted children as defined in Article 14A 9of this Code. 10    For the purposes of paragraph (A) of this subsection (2), 11"average daily attendance" means the average of the actual 12number of attendance days during the previous school year for 13any enrolled student who is subject to compulsory attendance 14by Section 26-1 of this Code at each school and charter school. 15    (2.5) For any school report card prepared after July 1, 162025, for all high school graduation completion rates that are 17reported on the school report card as required under this 18Section or by any other State or federal law, the State 19Superintendent of Education shall also report the percentage 20of students who did not meet the requirements of high school 21graduation completion for any reason and, of those students, 22the percentage that are classified as students who fulfill the 23requirements of Section 14-16 of this Code.24    The State Superintendent shall ensure that for the 252023-2024 school year there is a specific code for districts 26to report students who fulfill the requirements of Section   HB3052- 10 -LRB104 09503 LNS 19565 b114-16 of this Code to ensure accurate reporting under this 2Section.3    All reporting requirements under this subsection (2.5) 4shall be included on the school report card where high school 5graduation completion rates are reported, along with a brief 6explanation of how fulfilling the requirements of Section 714-16 of this Code is different from receiving a regular high 8school diploma. 9    (3) At the discretion of the State Superintendent, the 10school district report card shall include a subset of the 11information identified in paragraphs (A) through (E) of 12subsection (2) of this Section, as well as information 13relating to the operating expense per pupil and other finances 14of the school district, and the State report card shall 15include a subset of the information identified in paragraphs 16(A) through (E) and paragraph (N) of subsection (2) of this 17Section. The school district report card shall include the 18average daily attendance, as that term is defined in 19subsection (2) of this Section, of students who have 20individualized education programs and students who have 504 21plans that provide for special education services within the 22school district. 23    (4) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this 24Section, in consultation with key education stakeholders, the 25State Superintendent shall at any time have the discretion to 26amend or update any and all metrics on the school, district, or   HB3052- 11 -LRB104 09503 LNS 19565 b1State report card. 2    (5) Annually, no more than 30 calendar days after receipt 3of the school district and school report cards from the State 4Superintendent of Education, each school district, including 5special charter districts and districts subject to the 6provisions of Article 34, shall present such report cards at a 7regular school board meeting subject to applicable notice 8requirements, post the report cards on the school district's 9Internet web site, if the district maintains an Internet web 10site, make the report cards available to a newspaper of 11general circulation serving the district, and, upon request, 12send the report cards home to a parent (unless the district 13does not maintain an Internet web site, in which case the 14report card shall be sent home to parents without request). If 15the district posts the report card on its Internet web site, 16the district shall send a written notice home to parents 17stating (i) that the report card is available on the web site, 18(ii) the address of the web site, (iii) that a printed copy of 19the report card will be sent to parents upon request, and (iv) 20the telephone number that parents may call to request a 21printed copy of the report card.22    (6) Nothing contained in Public Act 98-648 repeals, 23supersedes, invalidates, or nullifies final decisions in 24lawsuits pending on July 1, 2014 (the effective date of Public 25Act 98-648) in Illinois courts involving the interpretation of 26Public Act 97-8.   HB3052- 12 -LRB104 09503 LNS 19565 b1    (7) As used in this subsection (7):2    "Advanced coursework or programs" means any high school 3courses, sequence of courses, or class or grouping of students 4organized to provide more rigorous, enriched, advanced, 5accelerated, gifted, or above grade-level instruction. This 6may include, but is not limited to, Advanced Placement 7courses, International Baccalaureate courses, honors, 8weighted, advanced, or enriched courses, or gifted or 9accelerated programs, classrooms, or courses.10    "Course" means any high school class or course offered by 11a school that is assigned a school course code by the State 12Board of Education. 13    "High school" means a school that maintains any of grades 149 through 12.15    "Standard coursework or programs" means any high school 16courses or classes other than advanced coursework or programs. 17    By December 31, 2027 and by December 31 of each subsequent 18year, the State Board of Education, through the State 19Superintendent of Education, shall prepare a stand-alone 20report covering all public high schools in this State, to be 21referred to as the Expanded High School Coursework Snapshot 22Report. The State Board shall post the Report on the State 23Board's Internet website. Each school district with high 24school enrollment for the reporting year shall include on the 25school district's Internet website, if the district maintains 26an Internet website, a hyperlink to the Report on the State   HB3052- 13 -LRB104 09503 LNS 19565 b1Board's Internet website titled "Expanded High School 2Coursework Snapshot Report". Hyperlinks under this subsection 3(7) shall be displayed in a manner that is easily accessible to 4the public.5    The Expanded High School Coursework Snapshot Report shall 6include:7        (A) a listing of all standard coursework or programs 8    that have high school student enrollment;9        (B) a listing of all advanced coursework or programs 10    that have high school student enrollment;11        (C) a listing of all coursework or programs that have 12    high school student enrollment by English learners;13        (D) a listing of all coursework or programs that have 14    high school student enrollment by students with 15    disabilities;16        (E) data tables and graphs comparing advanced 17    coursework or programs enrollment with standard coursework 18    or programs enrollment according to the following 19    parameters:20            (i) the average years of experience of all 21        teachers in a high school who are assigned to teach 22        advanced coursework or programs compared with the 23        average years of experience of all teachers in the 24        high school who are assigned to teach standard 25        coursework or programs;26            (ii) the average years of experience of all   HB3052- 14 -LRB104 09503 LNS 19565 b1        teachers in a high school who are assigned to teach 2        coursework or programs that have high school 3        enrollment by students with disabilities compared with 4        the average years of experience of all teachers in the 5        high school who are not assigned to teach coursework 6        or programs that have high school student enrollment 7        by students with disabilities;8            (iii) the average years of experience of all 9        teachers in a high school who are assigned to teach 10        coursework or programs that have high school student 11        enrollment by English learners compared with the 12        average years of experience of all teachers in the 13        high school who are not assigned to teach coursework 14        or programs that have high school student enrollment 15        by English learners;16            (iv) the number of high school teachers who 17        possess bachelor's degrees, master's degrees, or 18        higher degrees and who are assigned to teach advanced 19        coursework or programs compared with the number of 20        teachers who possess bachelor's degrees, master's 21        degrees, or higher degrees and who are assigned to 22        teach standard coursework or programs;23            (v) the number of high school teachers who possess 24        bachelor's degrees, master's degrees, or higher 25        degrees and who are assigned to teach coursework or 26        programs that have high school student enrollment by   HB3052- 15 -LRB104 09503 LNS 19565 b1        students with disabilities compared with the number of 2        teachers who possess bachelor's degrees, master's 3        degrees, or higher degrees and who are not assigned to 4        teach coursework or programs that have high school 5        student enrollment by students with disabilities;6            (vi) the number of high school teachers who 7        possess bachelor's degrees, master's degrees, or 8        higher degrees and who are assigned to teach 9        coursework or programs that have high school student 10        enrollment by English learners compared with the 11        number of teachers who possess bachelor's degrees, 12        master's degrees, or higher degrees and who are not 13        assigned to teach coursework or programs that have 14        high school student enrollment by English learners;15            (vii) the average student enrollment of advanced 16        coursework or programs offered in a high school 17        compared with the average student enrollment of 18        standard coursework or programs;19            (viii) the percentages of high school students, by 20        race, gender, and program student group, who are 21        enrolled in advanced coursework or programs;22            (ix) (blank);23            (x) (blank);24            (xi) (blank);25            (xii) (blank);26            (xiii) (blank);  HB3052- 16 -LRB104 09503 LNS 19565 b1            (xiv) the percentage of high school students, by 2        race, gender, and program student group, who earn the 3        equivalent of a C grade or higher on a grade A through 4        F scale in one or more advanced coursework or programs 5        compared with the percentage of high school students, 6        by race, gender, and program student group, who earn 7        the equivalent of a C grade or higher on a grade A 8        through F scale in one or more standard coursework or 9        programs;10            (xv) (blank);11            (xvi) (blank); and12        (F) data tables and graphs for each race and ethnicity 13    category and gender category describing:14            (i) the total student number and student 15        percentage for Advanced Placement courses taken by 16        race and ethnicity category and gender category;17            (ii) the total student number and student 18        percentage for International Baccalaureate courses 19        taken by race and ethnicity category and gender 20        category;21            (iii) (blank);22            (iv) (blank); and23            (v) the total student number and student 24        percentage of high school students who earn a score of 25        3 or higher on the Advanced Placement exam associated 26        with an Advanced Placement course.   HB3052- 17 -LRB104 09503 LNS 19565 b1    For data on teacher experience and education under this 2subsection (7), a teacher who teaches a combination of courses 3designated as advanced coursework or programs, courses or 4programs that have high school student enrollment by English 5learners, or standard coursework or programs shall be included 6in all relevant categories and the teacher's level of 7experience shall be added to the categories.8(Source: P.A. 102-16, eff. 6-17-21; 102-294, eff. 1-1-22; 9102-539, eff. 8-20-21; 102-558, eff. 8-20-21; 102-594, eff. 107-1-22; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 103-116, eff. 6-30-23; 103-263, 11eff. 6-30-23; 103-413, eff, 1-1-24; 103-503, eff. 1-1-24; 12103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-780, eff. 8-2-24.)